Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 2661.
Powers and duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as opticians;

explain appeal procedures to opticians and applicants and complaint procedures to the public;

administer fees established by law;

receive applications for licensure, issue licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter, deny or renew licenses, and issue, revoke, suspend, condition, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer;

refer disciplinary matters for adjudication by an administrative law officer;

conduct or specify examinations and pass upon the qualifications of applicants for reciprocal registration;

conduct hearings as necessary for the issuance, renewal, or discipline of a license; and

establish by rule standards of education required of applicants, as well as minimum standards for any school presenting a course for present or future opticians.

The Director may, after consultation with the advisor appointees, adopt rules necessary to perform the Director’s duties under this chapter, including rules governing apprenticeship and continuing education. Rules adopted under this section shall not prohibit lawful advertising, the display of ophthalmic materials or merchandise, limit the place or location where opticians may practice, nor be designed to limit the number of opticians in the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. June 13, 2002;

2005, No. 27

, § 75;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2019, No. 30

, § 17.

§ 2662.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint two licensed opticians as set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129b

. One of the initial appointments may be for less than a five-year term. Appointees shall have not less than three years’ experience as an optician immediately preceding appointment and shall be actively engaged in optician practice in Vermont during incumbency.

The Director shall seek the advice of the optician advisors in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Advisor appointees shall be entitled to compensation and necessary expenses in the amount provided in

32 V.S.A. § 1010

for attendance at any meeting called by the Director for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 26.

§ 2663.
Repealed. 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 54.

§ 2664.
Repealed. 2005, No. 27, § 117(1).

§ 2665.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 17.

§ 2666.
Repealed. 2005, No. 27, § 117(1).